test/src/morphology/izh-test-N-päivyt_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - päivyt: # Noun 'sun'
     päivyt+N+Sg+Nom: päivyt
     päivyt+N+Sg+Gen: päivyen
     päivyt+N+Sg+Acc: päivyen
     päivyt+N+Sg+Part: päivyttä
     päivyt+N+Sg+Ill: päivyesse
     päivyt+N+Sg+Ine: päivyees
     päivyt+N+Sg+Ela: päivyest
     päivyt+N+Sg+All: päivyelle
     päivyt+N+Sg+Ade: päivyeel
     päivyt+N+Sg+Abl: päivyelt
     päivyt+N+Sg+Tra: päivyeks
     päivyt+N+Sg+Ess: päivyennä
     päivyt+N+Sg+Exe: päivyent

     päivyt+N+Pl+Nom: päivyet
     päivyt+N+Pl+Gen: päivyein
     päivyt+N+Pl+Acc: päivyet
     päivyt+N+Pl+Part: päivyeitä
     päivyt+N+Pl+Ill: päivyeisse
     päivyt+N+Pl+Ine: päivyeis
     päivyt+N+Pl+Ela: päivyeist
     päivyt+N+Pl+All: päivyeille
     päivyt+N+Pl+Ade: päivyeil
     päivyt+N+Pl+Abl: päivyeilt
     päivyt+N+Pl+Tra: päivyeiks
     päivyt+N+Pl+Ess: päivyeinnä
     päivyt+N+Pl+Exe: päivyeint
